Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB84.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 211 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall not promulgate any administrative
regulation that implements or enforces any directive from the World Health
Organization.
Section 2. KRS 211.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any owner or occupant who fails to comply with an order made under the
provisions of KRS 211.210 shall be guilty of a violation, and each day's
continuance of the nuisance, source of filth, or cause of sickness, after the owner or
occupant has been notified to remove it, shall be a separate offense.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, anyone who fails to comply with the
provisions of the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or who fails
to comply with an order of the cabinet issued pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a
violation. Each day of such violation or noncompliance shall constitute a separate
offense.
(3) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 211.182 shall, upon first offense, be
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Each subsequent violation of any provision of
KRS 211.182 shall constitute a Class D felony.
(4) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 211.842 to 211.852 or any
regulation adopted hereunder or any order issued by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services to comply with any provision of KRS 211.842 to 211.852 or the
regulations adopted thereunder shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Each day
of violation or noncompliance shall constitute a separate offense.
(5) A person who performs or offers to perform lead-hazard detection or lead-hazard
abatement services in target housing or child-occupied facilities who is not certified
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1029
as required by KRS 211.9063 or 211.9069 shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(6) Any person who performs lead-hazard detection or lead-hazard abatement services
in target housing or child-occupied facilities, who willfully violates the standards
for performing lead-hazard detection or lead-hazard abatement procedures included
in the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 211.9075 shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(7) The penalties provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section are cumulative and
are in addition to any other penalties, claims, damages, or remedies available at law
or in equity.
(8) Any person who violates any provisions of KRS 211.760 shall be fined not less
than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). Each day of
violation or noncompliance shall constitute a separate offense.
(9) Any person who violates any provision of Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a
Class D felony.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 2:20 PM Jacketed